# Eva Illouz "Consuming the romantic utopia. Love and cultural contradictions of capitalism

## Summary

* historical shift in the definition of love romance
  * sublime romantic love in the 18th century (subsumed unresolved sexual attraction)
  * vs societally accepted that sexual relations can be persued for their own sake -> no more "love at first sight"; rather (maybe counter intuitively, love becomes more "calculated" or people, especially upper-middle class, rely more on rational qualities in their search for a mate)

* and marriage: "should fulfill not only its traditional requirement of providing a framework for the reproduction of the species but also those of intense passion, fun, and excitement"

* historically, marriage was not based on love but on socio-economic factors
  * love was viewed as too turbulent and unpredictable and thus as unsuitable basis for marriage

* postmodern ethos requires romance to sustain a marriage and cautious against marriage without romance
  * especially women, expected to keep romance alive through beautification

* it is also empowering, especially for women to be away from the scrutiny of family and moral codes imposed by society -> post-modern consumerist view on romanticism gave them that

* the private view on and practices of romance shifted in the beginning of the 20th century starting in the working classes whose homes were too crowded to engage in the praxis of "calling" and instead sought romantic encounters outside the home
  -> liberated the romantic encounters, away from the scrutiny of family and community

* parallelly existing narratives
  * marriage is boring and dull and romance in it has to be kept alive in order for it to be successful
  * marriage is safe heaven/forever/"happily ever after"

* narratives and visualisations guide adolescents (and ppl in general) in the uncertain field of romance (how to behave? what is allowed?) -> "cognitive maps of romantic behavior"
  * a lot of these stories are harmful (see example below, p.45)
  * "A number of "social learning" theories in social psychology show that a behavior is likely to be imitated if it meets three conditions: if the source of the behavior is prestigious, if the behavior is associated with a social reward, and if there are no alternative sources of learning."

* "through the purchase of leisure the initial intensity of romance should and could be maintained"
* romanticism is associated with the consumption of luxury goods on the one hand and "purity"/"primitivity"/"authenticity" on the other
* so vacations to "exotic destinations" are also part
  (-> tourism is simultaneously destroying the destinations)

* love/romance associated with both spontaniety and stability
  * the crazy whirlwind romance trope, one of the most salient to represent romance, identified by everyone; mistrusted and desired at the same time
  * the steady, we-have-to-get-to-know-each-other, be compatible in order to make a long term relationship work view on love; sometimes described by people as unromantic/calculating/heartless but at the same time associated with stability and success of a long term relationship

* people with more cultural capital tend more to view activities that are not overtly consumption-based as romantic; and also to acknowledge and deconstruct romantic tropes (but many still act in accordance with them although they've recognised them and critically reflected on them)
  * nevertheless, they also consume more/have more financial/time resources to engage in leisure "romantic" activities *after* getting married as well and thus more easily "keep romance alive"

* people (nearly) always recount the whirlwind romance thrope/stories that follow it when asked to describe a romantic moment they've lived. That is very probably due to the fact that those make more concise stories (with beginning/dramatic arc/end) compared to steady, long-term relatioships which have become a part of everyday life and are partially stil ongoing.
  Still, this reproduces the notion that whirlwind is the only type of romance and every other relationship model is unromantic

---

p.7 (quoting Ann Swidler in Bellah R., R. Madsen, W. Sullivan, A. Swidler and S. Tipton, 1985, Habits of the heart: Individualsim and commitment in American life )
"Love remains one of the most important mythologies of our time."

## chap 1

p.30 (auch quote Lystra)
"Especially during courtship, it can be shown that romantic love as the central symbol of ultimate significance... [Lovers] were making deities of each other in the new theology of romantic love."

"One source of this mythology's power was a new equation of love—and marriage—with personal happiness."

"The systematic association between love, marriage, and bliss was different from the nineteenth century representations, in which love was more often a tragic rather than a happy feeling."

p.31
"What was new was not sentiments per se but the increasing *visibility * of romantic *behaviors* such as petting and kissing in the public settings, often opulent and glamorous, represented everywhere through the collective and ubiquitous mass media"

p.33
"Because they combined beauty, youth, glamour, wealth, conspicuous consumption, and relentless excitement, these stars embodied the ideal of the perfect couple as constructed by the culture of consumption."

p.36
"The beauty-romance link was extended to cover the desire for self-expression, and the new nexus of beauty, self-expression, and romance was in turn fostered by the culture of consumption.
Love was thus made to reinforce a definition of selfhood centered around the commodities that provided youth, beauty, charm, glamour, and seductive power."

p.37
"contrasting the "dullness of marriage" to the "thrill of romance" "

p.38
"Oblique consumption is important to notice because it illustrates how leisure activities were deeply fetishized by the romantic aura cast over so many other commodities: through romance, consumption acts are invisibly mutliplied and redundantly affirmed."

"the economic underpinnings of oblique consumption are never presented as such, this form of consumption is mystified as "experiences" or "interactions" between people.
Thus, for example, the movie theater or the dance stands for intimacy, and the car ride for romantic adventure and excitement, rather than for economic transactions."

p.39
"They sought to convince the audience that passion would flee if either partner (particularly the wife) became careless about his or her physical appearance and seductive behavior."

p.40
"being recognized as married renders a woman less glamorous and seductive"
"Now it was sexuality, rather than domesticity, that united and uplifted a couple"
"Some ads went so far as to suggest that romance could be maintainedeternally within marriage if one used the appropriate commodities."

p.41
"Efficient cleaning products, the arguments ran, would make the wife happier and therefore more available to experiencing romance with her husband."

"This associative strategy—making commodities "romantic"—worked because it played on the new anxieties about the future and stability of marriage "
"..marriage was a fragile neterprise and divorce a likely outcome."
"To calm these new fears, the advertising industry recommended the consumption of intense romantic experiences and of seduction-enhancing products aimed at maintaining the initial thrill of romance."
"present marriage as a naturally dull state unless one took appropriate measures to maintain the thrill of youth and seduction"

"The home was no longer perceived as the altar to love and as the refuge from a "harsh" world."
//Oh? I suggest actually, that all those co-exist

p.42
"If during the premodern era love was expressed through poetry, drama, or myth, in the twentieth century if has become an essentially narrative and visual affair."

p.43
""icons", images at once well codified and held in holy respect."
"ready-made stereotypes that permeated and saturated people's cognition"

p.45
"The pervasive visualization not only intensified daydreaming but also provided cognitive maps of romantic behavior (e.g. kissing) that helped adolescents orient themselves in the changing mores of that first decades of the twentieth century."
"high percentage of adolescents learned romantic behaviors, mannerisms, and skills from the movies"
//argumentative extention to porn

from Blumer, H. 1933
"From watching love scenes in the movies I have noticed that when a girl is kissed she closes her eyes; this I found that I also unconsciously do... When [boys] go to make love, to kiss or hug, I put them off at first, but it always ends in them having their way. I guess I imitated this from the movies because I see it in almost every show I go to."
//reinforcing harmful stories/behaviors

"A number of "social learning" theories in social psychology show that a behavior is likely to be imitated if it meets three conditions: if the source of the behavior is prestigious, if the behavior is associated with a social reward, and if there are no alternative sources of learning."


p.47
"Victorian courtship contained built-in obstacles, pain was considered, almost by definition, to be intrinsic to the process of coming to know and love each other. Indeed, men and women of the nineteenth-century often recognized that pain was "essential and even unavoidable in romantic love."" //quote from Lystra, K. 1989 "Searching the heart"

"The view that love intivted introspection, a gradual disclosure of intimacy, and the careful effort of knowing another person changed to an "outward" view of romance, oriented toward an ideal of shared participation in the public sphere of leisure "

## Chap 2

p.49
"Public discussions of love during the first decades of the twentieth century were dominated by the perception that the institution of marriage was undergoing a major crisis."
"[Women] were asserting themselves in the realm of work.
More fundamentally, they were rejecting the institution of marriage as the only safeguard of their economic standing.
Becoming less dependent financially, women were expecting from marriage emotional fulfillment rather than economic security." //viel Spaß damit

p.50

"Articles criticized romance on the ground that its focus on pleasure and its basis in fantasy and unreal expectations were destructive of marriage, and they cited the new ideals of passion and thrill as causes of the increasing rate of divorce."

"these articles argued that the new romance was the figment of an overexcited imagination"

p.52

"all the new experts agreed that the marriage relationship should be controlled by the dispassionate logic of friendship and restrained feelings"
-> Die Frage ist, wozu sie überhaupt da ist. Wenn der Zweck davon ist, eine stabile Umgebung zu schaffen, wo man gut Kinder großziehen kann, ist das gar keine schlechte Idee. Siehe zb S+M zu wo es schief gelaufen ist, als man das anders versucht hat

"expectations regarding marriage were changing: the ability in both men and women to be amusing and entertaining was becoming more important than the husband's role as a provider and the wife's as a helpmate"

p. 56
"restructured the boundaries between private and public spaces by creating "islands of privacy" in the midst of the public realm."

p.57
"The automible was soon seen as a threat to traditional forms of control by parents"

p.59
"The anonymity offered by the darkened theater proved a great boon to romance."

p.61
"going out, the basic dating activity now practiced by all segments of American society, originated with the working classes, whose cramped homes lacked the space and privacy necessary for "calling"."
"The increase in commercial leisure activities facilitated the spread of dating by giving the young couples plces to go."

p.66
""seduction" was to be achieved and maintained through the consumption of products for self-enhancement"
"money is a central component of romantic encounters, both prior to and during the date"
"cultivation of romance was not cheap"

p.69
"both before-the-date (grooming, clothes) and during-the-date (entertainment, food, transportation) acts of consumption were perceived as "natural", intrinsic elements of the dating system"

p.69 -> potential story
"the 1963 Complete Guide to Dating portrays the disappointment of a woman who has not beed asked out on a date: "There goes the phone and the call's for you: 'Mind if I drop over for the evening?' asks the current man in your life. And what do you say? For a moment you may feel angry: why didn't he ask to take you to a movie, or at least for a soda at the Malt shop? Well, simmer down for a moment before you give him a cold brush off."
Obviously, this author took for granted that a "good" date meant going out and engaging in some form of leisure consumption, even if minimal."

p.72
"This "trickle-down" process was accompanied, as we have seen, by a contrary, upward movement, the adoption and legitimation of certain working-class behaviors and values by the middle classes.
Middle-class and working-class romantic styles and leisure practices intially confronted each other but ultimately merged "

p.75
"In modern romantic love, money and social status are not supposed to interfere with sentiment, and choosing a partner solely on these grounds is usually considered improper.
This "desinterested" ideal stands in sharp contrast to the openly acknowledged view of marriage as an economic and even profitable transaction that predated the rise of the modern romantic ideal."

p.77
"blurring of the boundaries between "romance" and "long-lasting love", or rather the attempt to merge them into a single model, has rendered problematic the ability to choose between two incongruent cultural and emotional repertoires.
The new, self-contradictory formula of romance was the outcome of social and symbolic struggles between different worldviews."

"I propose that already in the early twentieth century there was a disjunction between a vision of love based on the themes and images of the sphere of consumption and one based on the values and discourse of the sphere of production.
Contrary to Bell, however, I view the contradiction between these two ethics as subsumed by a higher order of rationality, that of capital in the larges possible sensem cultural as well as economic."

## Chap 3

p.82
"By presenting commodities as attributes of erotic attraction or achieved intimacy, advertisers used romance to fetishize consumption, that is, to transpose erotic desire onto goods, which in turn became themselves the very objects of desire."

"advertising does not make culture "materialistic" but rather elevates materials goods to a quasi-spiritual level"

p.83
"the three product categories .. most often associated with romance were those contributing to image-building(e.g., perfume, dress, and makeup), leisure (e.g., hotel, travel, and drinking), and gift-giving (e.g., diamonds)"

p.87
"Numerious ads present romance as a realm of pure feeling, sensuality, and instataneous pleasure, free of the friction and power struggles of real relationsips and attained more by magic than by work."

Difference between "romance" and "love" (vgl love and limerance):
p. 103 "Visual signs of romance were typically associated with such feelings as spontanieity, ease, excitement, and happiness. The visual signs of love, however, were associated with endurance, solidarity , and stability."

p.108, quoting an IV
"Oh, the myth about happily ever after and the myth of being swept off your feet, the myth you know, I think the most dangerous myth for women finding a man or being attached to a man somehow is, is so terribly important in order to make your life right or something, I think those are very powerful for most people whether they think about it or even know it.
I think those are probably the most powerful things, and I'm sure for me too even though I have thought about it a lot.
Some of my ideas are from not wanting what my parents what my parents had and I guess mostly just from those *images that you see in the media and that you see your friends all trying to live up to, probably the most influential things*. (Female editor, interview 48, emphasis added)"
"This woman, like many of her educated counterparts in my sample, expressed the feeling that her experience is derealized, a simulacrum of empty and media-fabricated images."


## Chap 4

romantic atmosphere:
* extraordinary
* secluded/private: both in temporal and spatial regard
  * temporal: before/after the workday, at night/dusk/dawn, when noone else is around are considered more romantic times
  * spatial: move away from the regular domestic space: in nature; remote locations; having a private "island"/"buble" amidst chaos
* "celebration time"/vacation/"fantasy world"
  * Idea: Comment on the mini break to Paris from that perspective?
* romance (aka spontaniety, excitement) needed to keep affection alive
* one has to take time out of every day life and work specifically in order to create it
* ritual:
  * specific elements/objects, highly dramatised associated with it; (gifts, extravagant meals, fancy clothes)
  * cyclical celebration (the first time they met/got together/married/Valentine's day)
  * foods and bevarages consumed in a ritualised way (similar to earlier religious celebrations): wine, "exotic/special" foods
* parallels to religion: the subject of love/religious feeling perceived as unique:
  "becoming pure essence"; "merging of souls"..
  "awe and intensity felt in the religious experience and romantic sentiment"

p.118 "A romantic moment for me is a time of crisis, in which the adrenaline and the nerves are at a certain pitch. (female editor, interview 3)"
"one's emotional energy is heightened and intensified"

"a romantic moment stands outside the taken-for-grantedness of the everyday world"
"that little extra", "spice", "flavor", "zest"

p.124
"the *only* respondents who sustained romantic interactions without the mediation of a technology or a comodity (through talk mostly) were the ones with the highest cultural competence"

p.125
"consumerist romantic moments serce as the standard against which nonconsumeris moments areconstructed*"

p.126 "the association of romance with consumption is *acquired ealries and is mentally more salient that the representation of nonconsumerist romantic moments*"

p.131 "The romantic dinner at home uses many of the elements of restaurant rituals: food and dress "nicer" than usual, soft lighting, background music."

p.141 "Traditional theories of memory predict that people are most likely to remember events that correspond to an already existing schematic structure" (This also explains why people only remember seeing in an art museum works they've already known before going there)

p.145 "is modern romantic love a utopia, that is, a category of the imagination that articulates values alternative to the market and commodity exchange, or is it an ideological system serving and furthering the interests of capitalism?"

p.147 "Equating choices between brands of commodities with freedom would probablly be derided my communitarians or neo-Marxists as the false freedom allotted by the alliance between media and capital, but I would argue that such rhetoric of freedom — however morally impoverished— provides a powerful cultural idiom articulating freedom to choose, enter, or leave one's relationships.[...] has been avidly capitalized by the market"

p.149 "Marx argued that consumption creates compulsive needs because ultimately it can never satisfy them. This frustration of needss makes us engage in repeated attempts to fulfill them."

p.151 "My results indicate that the romantic bond has indeed been colonized by the market, but I argue that capitalism has neither debased a more meaningful (Victorian) love nor "domesticated" a more subversive love. Consumerist love invokes values and principles that have had an emancipatory potential throughout Western history: individualism, self-realization, affirmation of the individual's personal qualities, and equality between the sexes in the mutual experience of pleasure."

## chap5

p.153
"When we invoke Romeo and Juliet as mythical figures of love, we conveniently forget that before he loved Juliet, Romeo went through the turmoils of an equally intense and impossible passion for Rosaline.
Still sick of love for Rosaline, Romeo accidentally sees Juliet and, iinstantly transferring his flame, falls in love with her.
Upon confessing his new-found love to Friar Lawerence, the latter ironically comments on Romeo's sudden change of heart:
  Is Rosaline, that thou didst love so dear,
  So soon forsaken? You men's love then lies
  Not truly in their hearts, but in their eyes.
Later in the dialogue, Friar Lawrence ventures to explain that Rosaline did not return Romeo's love because "she kne well [Romeo's] love did read by rote, that could not spell."
Friar Lawerence's remark, hinting at the fact that Romeo has mimicked a culturally prescribed language of love, raises a question, that some five hundred years later, haunts the postmodern sensibility:
is authenticity possible when using culturally prescripted languages?"

p.154
"well-known maxim that many people would never have fallen in love had they not heard of it"

"result of overexcitable imaginations, or, worse, a mere fabrication of poets and novelists. It asserts that love ought to be motivated by the practical needs and conditions of people and that one should accomodate oneself to a less-than-prefect other in order to maintain the durable bond of marriage"
// the thing is though "of course it's all in your head, Harry. But this doesn't make it any less real."

p.155
"The philosopher Alasdair MacIntyre has further suggested that "we dream in narrative, day-dream in narrative, remember, anticipate, hope, despair, believe, doubt, plan, revise, criticize, construct, gossip, leanr, hate and love by narrative". Emotions arer embedded within narrative structures."
//the power of stories

p.158 "the meaning of slow-paced love stories is not as well codified as that of fast-paced ones"

p.159 "this legitimation of sex for its own sake has demystified the cultural narrative of "love at first sight""

p.160 "The view that to be successful a relationship should rest on the secure ground of mutual knowledge and familiarity was almost unanimous."

"the most widely established and toroughly codified model of love is not the model considered most likely to be successful"

p.161
"Because, especially if you're seeing a person every day or frequently, you have to accept at some point that you are dealing with a real person which has concerns which are very down-to-earth. And I think you can escape into an unreal world, and it basically means that you are neglecting these concerns. (Male PhD student, iv 24)"

p.163 "[If] you're in a good love relationship, it means that it is alive, that it is changing. You put energy into it, you put effort into it, you give something to the other person, and they give something to you. It is always work[..] (Female artist, iv 33)" //that's true for all relationships, I daresay

p.165 "simultaneously professing two incompatible narratives of love"
"respondents alternately embraced both narrative frames, the idealist and the realist"

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Daring Greatly Brené Brown

p.105

In "The Gifts of Imperfection", I share the definition of love that I developed based on my data. Here it is:
    We cultivate love when we allow our most vulnerable and powerful selves to be deeply seen and known, and when we honor the spiritual connection that grows from that offering with trust, respect, kindness, and affection.
    Love is not something we give or get; it is something that we nurturre and grow, a connection that can only be cultivated between two people when it exists within each one of them—we can only love others as much as we love ourselves.
    Shame, blame, disrespect, betrayal, and the withholding of affection damage the roots from which love grows.
    Love can only survive these injuries if they are acknowledged, healed, and rare.


"Professionally, it just seemed arrogant to try to define something as big and important as love.
It felt like an endeavor best left to the poets and artists.
My motivation was not to "nail it", but to start a conversation about what we need and want from love."

"Personally, I fought the data with everything I have.
Over and over, I heard the idea of self-love as a prerequisite to loving others, and I hated it."

----------------------------------------------------------

# Dorothy Tennov - Love and Limerence. The Experience of Being in Love

## chap1: The Beginning

"When writers were not vague, they tended to contradict each other, disputing even the basic nature of love.
Was it an emotion, an attitude, a sentiment, a personality type, a neurotic manifestation, a way of looking at the world, a means of emotional manipulation, a sublime passion, a peak experience, a religion, a desire, a mental state, a perversion of thought, a prepossession, a biological urge, a type of mystical experience, a weakness of will, an obsession, an aesthetic reaction, a sacred state, a universal thirst, a glimpse of heaven?"

"Some writers disparaged the "myth of love", in which two healthy, normal, and attractive people, each of whom is of that gender to which the other is attracted, meet, most often by accident, and realize they are "right" for each other.
The "love story" concerns their increasing attraction and desire for each other and the difficulties they encounter — whether internal, or external in origin. " //Vgl Timeless
"Eventually, in in the words of a sociologist, 
"Believing that love is a panacea, that the future holds only goodness for them, they marry and form a new nuclear family."1 (Sidney M Greenfield, "Love and Marriage in Modern America: A Functional Analysis" The Sociological Quarterly 6 (1965))
A psychologist described the "True Romance Package":
  A man and a woman, young and beautiful, are drawn together by a strong physical attraction that tells them that they are meant to satisfy one another's erotic and affectional needs.
  They are tossed about by the fury of passion and excitement and pain and fear, **the two of them alone against the world** and others who will intrude, forever and everlasting.  //emphasis mine
  Obsessed with one another to addiction, they are willing to risk all to retain the feeling of being in love.
  They are scornful of reason or harsh realities —the two of them, in love with love"2 (Sarah Cirese, Quest: A search for Self, 1977)

"The implication of the article was that the pattern is culturally induced and not quite real, a mental aberration." // it is in my opinion, at least partially, culturally induced AND mental abberation, but that doesn't make it any less real

Purpose of the book
"I wanted to know what causes people to fall in love, whether some people are more likely than others to fall in love, what is the incidence of unhappy love and how can we help people who are unhappy because of love."
"I would look for aspects common to the romantic experience, particularly those aspects of what was termed "love" that produced distress."

Method/data:
"especially published autobiographies and unpublished personal journals"
"series of questionnaires[...] that asked for true or false responses to approximately 200 statements about romantic love, sex, and personal relationships."

Denotes informant quotes:
\quote{
    Even when a man showed little interest, I would find myself totally involved. //vgl Dari^^
    It wasn't as painful as it probably sounds, because whenever I knew I would see him, even if only at a public gathering, I would spend my time imagining things that *might* happen.. // Kopfkino; emphasis in original
    [...]
    Sometimes I was happier when something *might* happen[...] than when I was actually with whichever man was 'right' at that time.
}

"The dictionary lists two dozen different meanings of the word "love".
And how does one distinguish between love and affection, liking, fondness, caring, concern, infatuation , attraction or desire?"

"... being in love is not the same, One is a state; the other, an act, and an act is chose, not something merely endured."

"To be in the state of limerence is to feel what is usually termed "being in love.""

## chap2: The Infividual Experience of Limerence

"Limerence is not mere sexual attraction."
"Limerence is a desire for *more* than sex, and a desire in which the sexual act may represent the symbol of its highest achievement: reciprocation. //emph in original
Reciprocation expressed through physical union creates the ecstatic and blissful condition called "the greatest happiness," and the most profound glorification of the achievement of limerent aims.
"

"Love is a human religion in which another person is believed in.
-- Robert Seidenberg" (Robert Seidenberg, Marriage in Life and Literature)
//vgl Laurie Penny, LoveTM

"Limerence has certain basic components:
* intrusive thinking about the object of your passionate desire ( the limerent object or "LO" ), who is a  possible sexual partner
* acute longing for reciprocation
* dependancy of mood on LO's actions or, more accurately, your interpretation of LO's actions with respect to the probability of reciprocation
* inability to react *limerently* to more than one person at a time (exception occur only when limerence is at low ebb—early on or in the last fading) 
* some fleeing and reansient relief from unrequited limerent passion through vivid imagination of action by LO that means reciprocation
* fear of rejection and sometimes incapacitating but always unsettling shyness in LO's presence, especially in the beginning and wheneer unvertainty strikes
* intensification through adversity (at least, up to a point)
* acute sensitivity to any act or thought or condition that can be interpreted favorably, and an extraordinary ability to devise or invent "reasonable" explanations for why the neutrality that the desinterested observer might see is in fact a sign of hidden passion in the LO
* an aching of the "heart" (a region in the center front of the chest) when uncertainty is strong
* buyoancy ( a feeling of walking on air ) when reciprocation seems evident
* a general intensity of feeling that leaves other concerns in the background
* a remarkable ability to emphasize what is truly admirable in LO and to avoid dwelling on the negative, even to respond with a compassion for the negative and render it, emotionally if not preceptually, into another positive attribute.
"

"Limerence is first and foremost a condition of cognitive obsession." aka "intrusive thinking"

// Kopfkino is apparently universal in state of limerence, not only characteristic to women. (contradicts Caitlyn Moran)

\quote{ A lot of it was planning conversations.}

\quote{ I am in a position of passionately wnating someone I don't want at all and could find no use for if I had her. }

"In summary, limerent fantasy is, most of all, intrusive and inescapable.
It seems not to be something you do, but something *that happens*."

".. the course of limerence is as follows:
1. The limenrent reaction begins, usually at a point discernible at the time and later recalled. Sexual attraction as such need not be experienced, although (a) the person is someone you view as a possible sexual partner, and (b) the intial "admiration" may be,  or seem to be, primarily physical attraction.
2. Once limerence begins, you find yourself thinking about LO and receiving considerable pleasure from the process. There is an initial phase in which you feel buoyant, elated, and, ironically, for this appears to be the beginning of an essentially involutary process, free. Free not only from the usual restraints of gravity, but emotionally unburdened. You may be attracted to more than one potential LO. You feel that your response is a result of LO's fine qualities.
3. With evidence of reciprocation from LO, you enjoy a state of extreme pleasure, even euphoria. Your thoughts are mainly occupied with considering and reconsidering what you may find attractive in LO, replaying whatever events may have thus far transpired between you and LO, *and* appreaciating qualities in yourself which you perceive as possibly having sparked interest in you on the part of LO.
4. Your degree of involvment increases if obstacles are externally imposed or if you doubt LO's feelings for you. Only if LO were to be revealed as highly undesirable might your limerence subside. Usually, with some degree of doubt its intensity rises further, and you reach the stage at which the reaction is virtually impossible to dislodge, either by your own act of will, of by further evidence of LO's undesirable qualities. This is what Stendhal called crystallization. The doubt and increased intensity of limerence undermine your former satisfaction with yourself. You acquire new clothes, change your hairstyle, and are receptive to any suggestion by which you might increase your own desirability in LO's eyes. You are inordinately fearful of rejection.
5. With increases in doubt interspersed with reason to hope that reciprocation may indeed occur, everything becomes intensified, especially your preoccupation percentage. At 100 percent you are mooning about, in either a joyful *or* a despairing state, preferring your fantasies to virtually any othzer activity unlsess it is (a) acting in ways that you believe will help you attain your limerent objective, such as beautifying yourself and, therefore increasing the probability that you will impress LO favorably during your interaction, or (b) actually being in the presence of LO. Your motivation to attain a "relationship" (mating, or pair bond) continuses to intensify so long as a "proper" mix of hope and uncertainty exist[.]
6. At any point in the process, if you preceive reciprocation, your degree of involvement ceases to rise—until, of course, you become uncertain again.

"The objective that you as a limerent presistently pursue [...] is a "return of feelings.""

"What, truly, does "return of feelings" mean?"
"Uncertainty asbout LO's true reaction is an aessential aspect of your own limerence.
Removal of the uncertainty is the goal, and  because your desire is so unrelenting, so imperative, you continually search for the meanings underlying events."

"The inclination to sift through nuances of speech and subtleties of behavior for evidence of liemernt hope presented itself repeatedly in the interviews." //vgl Rachel searching for clues

\quote{*No matter what she did*, I could interpret it in my favor.}

"Thus the person may carry [the] action quite far, before accepting a rejection as genuine." quote from William J Goode "The Theoretical Importance of Love", Americal Sociological Review 24

"It is almost impossible for a woman in love to play this game well...
To the extent that she still has regard for her lover, she will feel it repugnant to duper him; how could he remain a god in her eyes?
If she wins the game, she destroys her idol; if she loses it, she loses herself.
There is no salvation." // quote from the Second Sex, Simone de Beauvoir

"The limerent aim of return of feelings is an obsession that so overrides all other considerations that, as Ovid warned in the famous Ars Amatoria, written almost 2000 years ago, the lover and beloved are "shy predator and willy prey" and the nature of their love is "conquest"."
"Is this deplorable state of affairs a necessary aspect of love? It does seem essential to *limerence*; hence the need for a new term.
It appears, sadly enough, that limerent demands are contrary by nature when a limerent response in the other person can be killed by too early or blatant a dispaly of affection.
"Love," in most of its meanings, involves concern for other person's welfare and feelings."

"While liemrence has been called love, it is not love.
Although the limerent feeld a kind of love for LO at the time, from LO's point of view limerence and love are quite different from each other."

"No wonder those who view limerence form an external vantage are baffled by what seems more a form of insanity than a form of love."

"[Jean-Paul Sartre] notes that each of the lovers seek the love of the other without realizing that what they want if *to be* loved." //vgl Jo March "Do you love him?- I care more about being loved. - It's not the same thing.- No."

##chap 3: The Other Sides Of Limerence

"The state ot unreturned limerence is one of relative (and often self-imposed) isolation.
Happy lovers are off somewhere together enjoying the bliss of mutuality.
Indeed, whenever an acknowledged relationship exists, even if it is troubled, much time is spent in interaction.
Although they may eventually grow bored or annoyed, friends and family are usually around to serve as sounding boards advice givers, and sometimes sources of sympathy and support.
Besides there are *things* to tell them, real events, not just reports of emotional upheaval generated by the subtleties of what limerents imbue with meanings not visible to the listener.
To say, "Then he beat me 40 times," makes a more entertaining tale than, "I could see it in the way she looked at me."
The secretly limerent person fixated on an LO who gives little or no positive response more quickly runs out of "material" capable of holding a friend's interest."

".. the end of his limerence, when it finally came, seemed possible only because he was able to alter his situation and put both an ocean anda new lover between Laura and himself."

Daily contact is bad:
"Among those whose stories were similar to Fred's were employees who worked in the same office, professor and student at a university, psychotherapist and patient, members of a dance company or other artistic group, students attending the same school, or people living in the same neighborhood.
The basic similarity in the situations wasa that there existed a relationship between the two people during which occurred the neutral and totally nonamatory contacts that perpetuated the limerent reaction.
Because Fred saw Laura daily, their neutral contacts were more frequent than most."

"In other cases, factors that inhibited the transfer of the attachment to another LO included lack of confidence in physical attractiveness, relative isolation from opprotunities to attract another person, and social pressures, such as those brought to bear on married people or on the homosexual person in love with a heterosexual member of the same sex."

"Fred and every otehr person whose situation, and limerence, was similar to Fred's were fully functioning, rational, emotionally stable, normal, nonneurotic members of society."

"Then you reach the final torment: utter despair poisoned still further by a shred of hope.
-- Stendhal" (Stendhal, Love)

"He told me about the diaries he had kept while in France and how he had felt that the material was possibly of "scientific usefulness", but that he had almost destroyed them a number of times "out of the humilitation of having been so crazy.""

"Note here the tendency to find value of some kind, despite the suffering.
Such "rationalizations" were common among interviewees."

\quote{
    I am inhibited in writing this diary.
    I find it frightening to commit so much personal material to paper.
    I suppose the main reason for doing it is because there is no one else to speak to.
    It would be very embarrassing to have anyone read how much time and energy I  am putting to this thing.
    I still fear that what I want to happen might in fact happen, and it scares me as much as the possibility that it will not happen.
}

\quote{ But it is a disservice to a person not to perceive them the way they really are. }

\quote{ At any rate, the whole thing is insane. I am not being myself in her presence. }

"In his distress Fred writes long passages almost daily describing every little interaction between himself and Laura"

!!"Limerence can live a long life sustained by crumbs.
Indeed, overfeeding is perhaps the best way to end it.
It bears a definite resemblance to the condition of the laboratory rats and pigeons who continue to press the bar or peck at the disk even when the probability of food reward is gradually diminished"
"Ordinary gambling resembles this laboratory behavior in its persistence even when chances of winning are slight."

\quote{
    .. you behave in love in ways that do not reepresent your own true best interests, way that deflect from the goals you've built your life around[...]
    Consider the 30,000 hours—I actually calculated my estimation, and that's a conservative figure—I spent going over every word he said, every gesture, every letter he wrote, when I might have been reading, or learning a foreign language, or enjoying the company of others.
}
 
\quote{
    If I had not written in this diary, I would never have believed myself capable of such long-term idiocy.
    But this volume provides incontrovertible proof.
    I can't hide my shame from myself.
}

"Before limerence begins and after it is over, you may be in a state not of limerence but of readiness."

"The diaries of adolescents often describe longing for "someone", as if limerence gets turned on at a certain age, or hormone level, or stage of "psychosexual" development, regardless of the presence of a suitable LO."
// Warum Teenie Mädchen ständig random Schwärme haben

"Two thrids said they "need someone to love and to love me", and more than half complained of loneliness." //For the purpose of being in love

"What is a "potential LO"?
The anwer appears to be anyone who meets certain rough criteria."
\quote{
    I love Bruce.
    I love him more than I have ever loved anyone.
    I am quite helpless about it.
    Fully involved.
    *But* I also know that I would have fallen in loven with any fairly decent-looking unmarried man who had happened to move into the apartment next door.
    Anyone.
    I know that and yet, now, it could not be anyone else.
    That's just the way it is.
}

"Perhaps there is some truth in the idea of being "in love with love"" //vgl moving to Inverness

"Perhaps limerence tends to decline as a person grows older, mainly because sources of hope that the feeling could possibly be returned are reduced."

\quote{
    All the men I might have foudn interesting were married or had gone off somewhere.
}

"Some few of my interveiwees had crossed over from limerence to nonlimerence after an early experience described as "traumatic" and, so far as they could tell in retrospect , very like the limerent pattern."

"The majority of consistently nonlimerent persons interviewed appeared to maintain their invulnerability without conscious effort.
Limerence simply didn't happen to them, and they were completely befuddled by my descriptions.
Such persons often mentioned that they have long been concerned about what was "missing" in their lives.
Clearly, love as described in song, drama, literature, and by friends, with its ecstatic bliss of mutuality, had never happened to them.
They wanted it as one wants to see a movie all have raved about.
Not passionately, but with a degree of uneasiness about being left out." 

\quote{ //by a person been a LO
    After that, I really watched it.
    If anyone began to give me those looks, I'd cut it fast.
    I never wanted to have what happened with Steve happen again.
    I didn't want to be hassled.
    I didn't care what they did when they weren't with me.
    I mean I wasn't jelaous and I didn't want their jelaousy ruling my life!
}

\quote{
    ... definitely not interested in marriage at this time.
    Maybe never.
    I have been in love, I have been hurt, and as far as I'm concerned you can keep it.
    I don't have the time or the interest.
}
"Joe had suffered through a very painful limerence, one which kept him from his work and severely damaged his self-esteem.
He was determined that hewould prevent himself from getting into such a state again."

\quote{
    This is wonderful.
    Now I know what is happening, and I can tell Barry all about it.
    Maybe that will make him leave me alone little more often and not feel so bad about it.
    I think, from what you say, that he must be limerent.
} //having words for things; applying theory to practice

"Limerence still made no sense to him, but now, at least, it had a name and it happened to a lot of people.
They weren't making it up in all those songs and all those movies."

\quote{ So I'm a  nonlimerent. Well, it sounds like a nice and healthy thing to be. }

## chap4: The Social Effects of Limerence

"What does limerence look like to others?
What does a limerent person do?
How does limerence influence interactions with others, and how does it affect practices and institutions in society?"

"[B]ecause limerence itneracts with other aspects of person's life, its significance extends beyond the relationship with LO."

"If I want you to want me as I want you when what I want from you is that very wanting, we end up, if not with a paradox, with a very elusive idea."

\quote{
    I recently reread my diary of 10 years ago, when I was in love with Brad, someone for whom I have no feelings at all anymore.
    It was very painful to read, not because of Brad, but because he was occupying so much of *me* at a time when tehre were otehr things in my life that I no logner have, but didn't appreciate at the time because of my total focus on Brad.
}

"As limerent you want (1) to be with LO, or (2) to be where LO is likely to be, if the relationship fails to permit actual continual contact."
"Poor substitutes for being in LO's presence are (3) to be alone thinking about LO, and finally (4) to talk about LO.")
"The effect of limerence can be almost anti-social."

"mood swings"
"The shift from the elation of perceived reciprocation—real or not—to the despair of rejection—again real or imagined—can occur with such swiftness as to seem instantaneous."

"The behavioral aspects of limerence, with certain exceptions, tend to be undesirable.
As well as interference with other relationships, they include interference with work, destruction of peace of mind, and even violence."

"Limerence, however, cannot be controlled by the unhappy limerent who wants to end it, nor does it bow to the dictates of society."

### positive effects (book section)

"pleasures of limerence"

"One of the signs of limerent behavior that is hardest to hide is the effort at self-improvement, especially in physical appearance."
"Since an attractive appearance has value in the culture apart from that of capturing the itnerest of LO, the limerent drive to increase attractiveness can be counted as an advantagous by-product of the state." //unfortunately -.-

\quote{
    Yes, my appearance changed, too.
    Just like the others.
    I think I lost 10 pounds the first week simply because food bacame unimportant *and* because each pound taken off increased my conviction that I was both lovable and loved.
}

\quote{
    I tried to fit myself into the sort of person I felt *deserved* to be loved.
}

"This theme of having benefited, even from a love affair that did not last, was frequently expressed."

".. psychiatrist Robert Seidenberg said that someone who is in the hopeful or elated phase of love "generally has a warm feeling toward the world"." (From "Mariage in Live and Literature")
" The result of this process is that the limerent is more attractive to others as well."

"Another enduring positive effect[..]: the person in love often developed intense interest in and knowledge about whatever it was that deeply involved LO.
The limerent might also adopt some of the attitudes, personality, and behavior of the other person." (Cf. Toward an epistemology of romantic love, David Norton)

"Drugs were also viewed as relieving some of the distress caused by limerence."

\quote{
    It wasn't htat he made me feel less of a person, and it wasn't to keep me busy when he was busy.
    He inspired me.
    He set an example of how to do it and also how much pleasure it brings.
}

"Affectional bonding": "It is rational by comparison with limerence, and loving in what may feel is the "true sense of the term", i.e., having concern about, or caring.
It is what is described as the hoped-for relationship between limerents after the honeymoon"

\quote{
    I think that if I started to fall in love again—and I don't say it couldn't happen—I'd run like hell.
    I don't need that again.
}

"The chaste but limerent woman paired with a sexually active but nonlimerent male is a classic of fiction and of sex-role stereotyping.
This situation was described by several female interviewees."

\quote{//non-limerent interviewee
    But after a while, things would suddenly change and I would be asked where I thought the relationship was "going". This was a question that always puzzled me, because I was quite happy about where it *was* and didn't feel any need for it to be more than what it was.
}
\quote{
    they would call and wonder what I was doing when I really had something to do that was important to me and had nothing to do with them.
    They acted as if everything I did absolutely had to involve them all the time, at every turn.
}
"The sowrd "suffocation" was used repeatedly in reports by interviewees fitting the nonlimerent pattern. "
\quote{
    The are always being 'hurt', and it's impossible to predict what will hurt them.
    I'll have a good time at a party only to be hit on the way home with something like,
    "Why did you ignore me all evening?"
    Reall, it's exasperating!
}

"Quite often, however, it is the limerent, rather than the nonlimerent partner who terminates the relationship.
Very often the break is accompanied by a "scene", which leaves the nonlimerent person saddened, distraught, and lonely."

"Limerence is sustained because one of its aspects is the desire for limerence itself."

"for those not in the state of limerence it may be very much desired, but failure of attainment does not produce the type of intense misery that may be unique to limerence"

"If a relationship does persist after the limerence of one or both partners has ended, it is because some other kind of bonding has taken place or because circumstances make it difficult to disengage."

//Interesting interpretations of the subversiveness of limerence
"Indeed, many of the practices which separated the sexes and thus facilitated arranged marriages could be interpretes as aids to the prevention of limerence, and, especially, to the prevention of limerence inspired decisions that disrupt the social order.

vgl auch William J Goode (American Sociological Review, 1959)
"although "violent, self-sufficient love" is rare, it is a potentially disruptive force in society which must be controlled because it has the power to estrange individuals from their kinship and lineage groups.
Furthermore, mating would be "random" if it depended on love for selection, and such mating is intolerablein societies in which power and property follow kin lines:
That includes all known societies to a greter or lesser degree."

"That divorce should increase, as it has in this century, may be an inevitable consequence of the selection of marriage partner by limerence—not merely because the limerent eye overfocuses on the attractive features of LO, but also because the same logic that says marry where your heart leads also says divorce and remarry where your heart leads."
//well, maybe we need to abolish marriage as an institution altogether.
//if it is about who inherits stuff, and who's to be notified if you end up in the hospital, everyonecould simply write this down.
//also, maybe divorce rates increased because women got more rights and are no longer treated as property and thus can legally more easily get out of abusive marriages

"The romantic ideal holds that for every person there is on earth the "right" otehr person, and you know when that person comes along because your feelings tell you.
To marry your LO is to experience the ecstasy of ultimate reciprocation.
Or so you feel."

"In other cases, limerence seems gradually, and less stressfully to be transformed into the genuine love of affectionate bonding."

"Descriptions of such happy marriages occurred regularly among older interviewees.
They suggest that love can replace limerence given the right circumstances."

\quote{
    I was lucky always to have fallen in love with men who didn't love me.
    It was tough being rejected, and my torch-carrying years were no picnic, but at least I didn't marry any of them.
    I shudder to think what I might have had to look at over the breakfast table today if I had gotten one of my wishes.
}

### negative effects

"Prolonged unhappiness following rejection is not rare nor is it confined to college students.
Literary critic William Hazlitt suffered despondency, disorganization, and inability wo work at his former evel of productivity for almost two years after being rejected by the chambermaid he loved (mostly in silence) for a year and a half."
//there goes the myth that romantic disappointmen serves as a great catalyst for work/art

"... the attempt to find relief from the agony of acute unhappy limerence is not uncommon, nor is it confined to persons considered unbalanced in a psychiatric sense"

"What spell the difference between the long suffering diary keeper and the wielder of weapons against a roaming LO may relate to how limerent individuals interpret not only actions of their LO, but limerence itself.
I spoke with many trapped in a limerence they would like to end.
When tiny, intermittent flickers of hope for reciprocation become chains of enduring bondage to a passion which provides no joy and unmitigated pain, some become enraged."

"The reaction of rage seems to be more frequent in men than in women.[...]
The number of murders  committed each year by men is many-fold greater than the number of murders committed by women"
//not clear whether whether murders in general or in relation to limerence.
//in the second case: small wonder, that's called patriarchy and rape culture. Men feel women are their property and owe them smth

"As it was for Henry VIII's wives, the role of LO can be hazardous for your health and welfare."

"Lilly does experience anger, however slight, and somehow it ends up being directed toward herself rather than toward LO or even the rival.
She *knows* she has *no reason* to be angry at others who cannot help doing what they're doing, but she feels anger anyway."

"Writers who. like Communist officals maintain a culturally determinist position that the experience of being in love results from its ubiquitous portrayal, find it hard to believe that the reverse may in fact be true."
//vlt bedingt sich das aber auch zumindest zum teil gegenseitig?

"There are many way in which profits can and have been made from appealing to limerent vulnerability."
// beauty industry comes to mind

"Do such cultural phenomena influence the incidence of limerence in the society? [e.g. singles vacations, parties, etc.; dating services; ]
It seems financially profitable to hold limerence as the ideal."
//so you agree about the cultural influence, at leat in part

## chap5 The Opinions of Philosophers, Psychologists and Other Experts

"Being in love has three images which seem difficult to reconcile with each other.
First, it is considered to be the source of the most intense human pleasure, even the most important thing in life — a transcendent state that has no parallel in human experience unless it be that of the religious mystic.
Second, being in love is viewed as a symptom of inferiority and weakness, excessive dependency, and low self-esteem.
Interestingly, these two images reflect the emotional reactions of the limerent person to LO's behavior:
a seemingly positive sign from LO and you walk on air in ecstatic bliss;
an action intrpreted as rejection, and you sink to the depths of misery.
The third image is expressed in a quotation from Dryden:
    For, heaven be thank's we live, in such an age
    When no man dies for love, but on stage." (Epilogue of Mithridates, King of Pontus)
It is this view that love is mere fancy, the product of a cultural climate that encourages it or, according to some writers, induces it."

Morton Hunt: (The Natural History of Love, p.365)
  Hopeless passion, one way love, and unrequited suffering belong truly to fiction and the medieval knight's long service of his lady.
  In our own time they exist generally in the form of the bobby soxer's hopeless adoration of the remote idol, but among maturing young people they are more illusion than related.
  Believed in but not practiced.

"And according to Suzanne Brogger, not many fall in love, who had not heard about it from others."

"contradictory reactions the subject of romantic love evoked in the writers of scientific literature"

"the term "taboo" could appropriately be used in connection with the study of romantic love"

//seminar discussion, both participants perceived as nonlimerent
".. Smith and Brown said real love, true love, was quite different from what I had described.
Brown said that genuine love was caring and concern for the other person"

"Human beings have had difficulty differentiating among:
1. sexual desire.
2. liking, in the sense of friendship
3. affection, and
4. love, in the sense of concern for the person's welfare"

"Those without personal knowledge of limerence explained the strange actions of limerents as the result of romantic (imaginative) fantasy.
They called it "storybook-like", "unreal", "romantic", the product of artistic imagination; poetic hyperbole; or vagueness."

"Both liemernts and nonlimerents among my interviewees suspected there was something going on they didn't know about, something they took as a personal failing."

"The liemerent interpreted nonlimerent external behavior as self-composure, self-confidence, individuality, independence,and mind over irrational desire.
The nonlimerent was not viewed as a person who does not desire, but as one whose "moral fiber" does not *allow* oassion to rule over reason.
When nonlimerernts told limerents to stop being silly and forget an LO who is not worth it and not interested, the limerents tried to obey.
They couldn't but couldn't believe that they couldn't."

"Most statements in the love literature could be interpreted as applying either to limerence or to affectional bonding.
These as well as other types of attractions were not clearly distinguishable from one another but instead were fused and merged by being called by the sane term, "love"."

"It is safer to write as a moralist, as an observer and evaluator outside personal involvement who may not know the precise nature of the subject matter, but who can indicate clearly what others ought and ought not do.
Much of the writing in the literature of love was written by persons, who, pershaps never having suffered the insanity themselves but having observed its outward manifestations, are adamantly opposed to it.
Limerent persons, sufferers of an unallowable condition, find themselves speechless save for the ambiguity of "poetic" expression."

"Love has been called a madness and an affliction at least since the time of the ancient Greeks and probably earlier than that.
Madness implies loss of control and inspires fear.
The unpredictability associated with irrationality is the same element thath inspires fear of "wild" organisms—spiders, snakes, insects, and strange dogs.
Such creatures evoke phobic reactions because we are unable to predict what they will do and are therefore left defenseless." 

"Limerents who had suffered often blamed weakness in their own character for their pain."

"Those who idealize nonlimerence for its reasonableness and consider the manifestations of limerence to be signs of psychopathology usually also hold that romantic love is a cultural invention."

"Many writers clearly agree with the statement of La Rochefoucauld:
    Very few people would fall in love if they had never heard of romance.
Graham Spanier has recently emphasized the role of exposure to romantic love content trough mass media (Romanticism and Marital Adjustment, The Journal of Marriage and the Family 34 (1972), 481-87)"

"[...] it is apparent that Fromm speaks from experience, (whether personal or not) with the phenomenon of what is here called limerence, his descriptions, like those of most writers on love, stress moralism and evaluation.[...]
the crix of his discussion appears to be the denial of involuntariness."

"Stendhal is virtually alone in failing to criticize the lover, the beloved, *or* the experience."

"Self-confidence and sel-esteem, according to [Robert] Solomon, are essential prerequisites for true love." (Im Grunde was auch bell hooks meint)

"The humanist position is also represented by George R. Bach and Ronald M. Deutsch, according to whom, in a "dehumanized society", love is increasingly sought, not as a "romantic luxury" or even as "security", but in hopes of achieving "authentic intimacy" in which the individual comes to feel peronally relevant and validated."
"Their basic message is that it is not good to be lovesick, so don't be lovesick"

"The problem is their assumption that choice is possible and that the only reason people get into such a silly state as limerence is willful wrongheadedness."

"What my studies suggest is that while it is illogical, it is also normal, and therefore normal human beings can be illogical." //dobrutro

"In the very *social* humanist and human potential movement ideology, which is largely a group movement, limerence's greatest sin is the exclusivity which causes lovers to close their door to the rest of the world."
//Tennov seems to criticize the attitude; I find, being concerned that people have "closed their door to the world" is valid

## chap 6 Limerence Among the Sexes

So generell wird das häufig Frauen zugeschrieben; bzw Liebe (natürlich, und care arbeit) wird Frauen zugeschrieben

"For the Greeks in classic times, love was a normally a female *ailment*... it was not a *disease* appropriate to men. -- Maurice Valency"(In Praise of Love) //Emph mine
"[Love is] a woman's whole existence. -- Lord Byron "(Don Juan, Canto 1) //vgl Jo March: "I'm so sick of it..." "

"Among the first-rate, man's life is fame, woman's life is love.
Woman is mn's equal only when she makes her life a perpertual offering, as that of man is perpetual action. -- Balzac"

"To be in love can be a full-time job for a woman, like that of a profession for a man. -- Shulamith Firestone" (The Dialectic of Sex)

"Approximately half of the females and a third of the males in the Group accepted the following statements:
"Women react to love very differently from the way men do" and
"Love is very different form women and for men." 

"Recent researchers have been surprised to find that when the general happiness and psychoemotional well-being of the sexes are related to marital status, the unmarried woman turns out to be best off, the married woman most unhappy, with the males fallin in between, and married males distinctly better off than bachelors."
//Was für eine Überraschung. Nicht. Verheiratete Frauen betütteln doch die Typen.
Footnote dazu: "This is an example of reality in blatant contradiction to common opinion."

"The *image* of woman as being in greater need of love could well result from a cultural upending of the actual inherent tendency.
The *social* forces operating on her—and it cannot be denied that throughout modern history they have operated quite harshly—permitted no other role than one in which she required the protection of a male.
If love were not a major concern, she might find herself literally left out in the cold."
"To say simply that "love is [a woman's] whole happiness" omits the fact that other sources of gratification have generally been denied to her;"

"I detected no difference in limerence based on gender."

"Those differences that did appear in questionnaire reactions seem better explained by reference to differences in socially imposed roles and values, or by differences in sexuality."

"it is known that limerence comes about when
(1) you are in a state of readiness (which means at least that you are not intensely limerent about someone else at the moment), and
(2) you encounter a member of your personal LO pool (that subcategory of all humans with the potential of exciting that response in you) who through look, word, or deed suggests that spark of interest in you that sets off the limerent reaction"

"the presence of members of the LO pool in your daily life might as well increase the chances of your becoming limerent"

"If you understand the condition well enought to predict its course, you are less likely to make damaging life decisions based on its emotional imperatives"

\quote{
    We're still married, and he still fools around, and I still don't like it, but the old anguish is over.
    Just like that.
    I became what you call nonlimerent and I've been that way ever since, over five years now.
    If anything, it has improved our relationship.
}

"Are the homely and aged generally spared unrequitable passions?"

"There is evidence that persons in the state of limerence are inclined to exaggerate or intensify their "sex roles"."
\quote{
    Actually, in both those cases, it was not that I was ignorant. I suppressed my knowledge and played the role of learning from him.
    Around that time I also acquired a taste for those stupidly frilly blouses that always get in your way when you're trying to cook or write or do anything except look at him wiltingly.
    I really fell right into femininity when I fell in love with Gregory.
    [...]
    In fact, he probably thought I was acting like a damned fool!
}

"People have been trying to control limerence without much success for as far back as the records go, but it is remarkably tenacious, involuntary, and resistant to external influence once it takes hold."
"[L]imenerece can be the ruling passion of a life. It can override self-welfare"

"Furthermore, being in love is often referred to not as something one *does*, but as the result of an alien force, a shot from Cupid's dart, a love potion, or *an enchantment*.
It is easy to imagine the male limerent, enslaved by his passion to an "inferior" being, attributing his condition to her deliberate machinations, to her sorcery."

"The reaction of the church to limerence was so extreme that for a time it was considered *adulterous* to love one's spouse with "excessive" passion. " :joy:

## Chap 7 Limerence and Biology

"As we have seen, most writers on love talk of madness, and a part of the madness is the victim's lack of control. [..]
Recovered former limerents tend to agree.
Those whose limerence was replaced by affectional bonding *with the same partner* might say,
"We were very much in love when we were married; today we love each other very much.""

"Limerence frees the young from too strong an attachment to the parents.
It may not ensure in human beings the kind of permanent monogamy sometimes found in other species, but its saverage duration of about two years allows a female to become pregnant, bear a child, and begin a new family."
//and then fall out of love, not find support from the man an be a single parent with insufficient economic resources ever after

"The relative arbitrariness of limerent fixation promotes matings among persons outside the limeren's immediate group, who may have no reason to be acquainted."

\quote{
    When in love you get very concerned about your lover's image of you.
    Thus you alter your posture and try, as you talk, to hide with your hands or clothing, your unattractive chin or nose, or other blemish.
    You might also, if especially unsure that your appearance is pleasing, make nervous gestures to distracct the viewer from the ugly sight.
} xD

"In study after studay, the result was the same: the better-looking people had the advantage.
Looks count, and they count in nonsexually related as well as sexually related attractions.
Although we claim that you can't tell a book by its cover and beauty is only skin deep, we fall for beauty."

"Hair dyes, makeup, attire, diet, and exercise regimes are regularly featured in popular magazines becausethey make the user feel more able to stimulate the limerent reaction in LO."
//Only for women though. Men, apparently, have other desirable qualities than physical beauty^^

"One possible answer is that physical attractiveness, and youth, in particular, may function as a rough indication of good health and other attributes that realte to breeding capability and thus genetic fitness.
Perhaps this explains why youth and early adulthood are times in which limerence is most probable."

"there are fashions in what is considered beautiful"

## chap8: Can Limerence Be Controlled?

"Limerence for a particular LO does cease under one of the following conditions:
*consumation*—in which the bliss of reciprocation is gradually either blended into a losting love or replaced by less positive feelings;
*starvation'—in which even limerent sensitivity to signs of hope is useless against the onslaught of evidence that LO does not return the limerence;
*tranformation*—in which limerence is transferred to a new LO."

"In the absence of effective limerence-inducing techniques for LO, sufferers have tried all variety of other means to free themselves from the "agony" side of the condition.
Suicide attempts which "fail" may in fact be helpful to the limerent sufferer.
Subsequent events might include a declaration of commitment by LO or distractions provided by the excitement that near brushes with death tend to generate"
"We have also seen the case in which violent physical activity provided a kind of catharsis."

"To recognize the negative is not necessarily to "take a position" in favor of or against limerence itself. "

"Limerence is not the product of human decision: It is something that happens to us.
Its intrusive cognitive components, the obsessional quality that may feel voluntary at the moment but that defies control, seem to be the aspect of limerence in which it differs most from other states."
//Vgl Amy March!

"When limerence for another person results in the breakup or disruption of a marriage, children can hardly be expected to "understand".
Sometimes they wonder whether their own actions might have helped to bring about the tragedy."

"I hope that it may be possible for limerents to ceasethat self-hatred that sometimes comes from being in the grip of so uncontrollable a force."

"There seems to be a certain point in the recovery process at which such recommendations can truly be helpful." //recommendations about how to fall out of love
\quote{
    At first, when friends suggested I go back to work I couldn't imagine it.
}

"Another highly reasonable sounding approach is the elucidation and enumeration of LO's faults, failing, and imperfections.
Except that the recounting of LO's unfavourable qualities is notable mainly for its failure to put an end to limerence."

"One recent book recommended pouring one's soul into a personal journal.[...]
I therefore fear that extensive writing about LO and your feelings of limerence might boomerang and result in intensification of the problem.
Fred reached the conclusion that writing in hiw journal might have been better for my research that iw was for hiw welfare."

"Perhaps the best cure you can administer to yourself is to remove all contact and all possibility of contact between yourself and your unresponsive LO."

"Recognition of the nature of limerence should not in my view mean that commitments to the relatioship, such as co-parenting and financial interdependencies, should not be honored.
I hope that knowledge if just what limerence is will in fact help in dealing with breakups by preventing the usual faultfinding and substituting a more realistic approach.
Although limerence demands a committed relationship, there can be commitments other than marriage."

"We may want to experiment with a variety of contractual forms, including forms designed primarily for affectional bonding.
Certaing aspects fo the commitment usually associated with marriage (for example, assumption of a common surname and financial responsibility, or dependence) could be eliminated or limited.
In other words, I would hope that social forms and customs could be changed to take account of the true nature of human beings and to reduce the dependency often established during limerence rather to serve mainly the interests of patriarchy and property ownership as the forms in existence at present tend to do."

"Knowledge of limerence will not prevent its occurrence except, maybe, by encouraging those who wish to avoid it to hide away in monasteries or run at the first flicker of feeling."
"There was a near unanimous feeling that limerence could be stopped voluntarily if it wwere "caught in time"."
\quote{ It'a basic policy. If anyone interests me more than causally, I stop it right there by avoiding him. }

"What can be done about it should you find yourself in the role of the nonlimerent LO?
Limerence has only one answer: Do whatever is necessary to eliminate any trace of hope." //no "I like you as friend"s etc.

"I think knowledge of the limerent state clearly suggests that the nonlimerent LO has certain responsibilities of an ethical kind."

"Instead of trying to help by offering friendly compassion (which is so easily taken as cause for "hope"), you will be resolute about not giving off any signals that could possibly be interpreted as signs of reciprocation.
Let others offer compassion to the limerent.
When possible, this will mean your ending the relationship altogether"
// which is why limerence towards friends is bad..

"Now imagine yourself in the role of the nonlimerent friend.
You try to find a way to help.
You say things like, "How can I help?" and the answer turns out to be that there's nothing you can do except listen passively, which gets boring and seems futile.
Really, dealing with an active and miserable limerent is a job no one's fit for—the nonlimerent, non-LO, good-natured, well-meaning friend least of all."

"My interviewees seemed unanimously grateful for what they felt would bea greater ability to deal with personal situations—especially with persons, including themselves, who might be suffering from some of limerence's less pleasant aspects, because, as one woman said,
"Limerence was bad enough, but on top of that was the terrible feeling that I was also crazy to be feeling it.
I mean literally crazy""

## Future Research
"I found that retrospective estimates of limerence underestimate intensity ycompared with reports given closer to the time at which the reaction was experienced."

"Affectional bonding appears to combine affection and sex better that does limerence, especially over the long haul."

--------------------------------------------------
# Adrienne Rich - When We Dead Awaken: Writing as Re-Vision
#
"she meets the image of Woman in books written by men. She
finds a terror and a dream, she finds a beautiful pale face, she finds La Belle Dame
Sans Merci, she finds Juliet or Tess or Salome, but precisely what she does not
find is that absorbed, drudging, puzzled, sometimes inspired creature, herself, who
sits at a desk trying to put words together."
--> what roles are absent in stories

``But in those earlier years I always felt the conflict as a
failure of love in myself. I had thought I was choosing a full life: the life available
to most men, in which sexuality, work, and parenthood could coexist. But I felt,
at 29, guilt toward the people closest to me, and guilty toward my own being.''
--vgl Laurie Penny at the beginning "We can have it all... The army of nannies and cleaning ladies which this life style requires, can they have it all too??"



---------------------------------
# bell hooks - all about love

## preface

"When I was a child, it was clear to me that life was not worth living if we did not know love."

"But it was love's absence that let me know how much love mattered."

"No other connection healed the hurt of that first abandonment [...]. For years I lived my life suspended, trapped by the past, unable to move into the future."

## introduction

".. in When All You've Ever Wanted Isn't Enough, Harold Kushner writer: 'I am afdraid that we may be raising a generation of young people who will grow up afraid to love, afraid to give themselves completely to another person, because they will have seen how much it hurts to take the risk of loving and have it not work out. I am afraid that they will grow up looking for intimacy without risk,, for pleasure without significant emotional investment. They will be so fearful of the pain of disappointment that they will forgo the possibilities of love and joy.' Young people are cynical about love.
Ultimately, cynicism is the great mask of the disappointed and betrayed heart."
--> I find it scary indeed to give myself fully to another person. If I did, then what's left of me for me? If it didn't work out, or even if it did

"As I pored over nonfiction books on the subject of love, I was surprised to find that the vast majority of the "revered" books, ones used as reference works and even those popular as self-help books, have been written by men."
^^ I am not at all

"Most men feel that they receive love and therefore know what it feels like to be loved; women often feel we are in a constant state of yearning, wanting love but not receiving it."
-- vgl also LP
-- vgl Little Women:
Marmee: "Do you love him?"
Jo: "I care more about beeing loved"
Marmee: "It's not the same thing as loving."

"Back then, in every creative writing course the poets dedicated to the love poem were always male.
Indeed, the partner I left after many years first courted me with a love poem.
He had always been emotionally unavailable and not at all interested in love as either a topic of discussion or a daily life practicce, but he was absolutely confident that he had something meaningful to say on the subject.
I, on the other hand, thought all my grown-up attempts to write love poems were mushy and pathetic."
-- women have impostor syndrome, men explain thingsTM

"Contemplating death has always been a subject that leads me back to love."
"my first thought as I waited for test results was that I was not ready to die because I had not yet found the love my heart had been seeking"

"In popular culture love is always the stuff of fantasy.
Maybe this is why men have done most of the theorizing about love.
Fantasy has primarily been their domain, both in the sphere of cultural production and in everyday life.
Male fantasy is seen as something that can create reality, whereas female fantasy is regarded as pure escape."

"few writers, male or female, talk about the impact of patriarchy, the way in which male domination of women and children stands i nthe way of love"

"many people feel that they do not have a clue as to how to love"

"It is easier to articulate the pain of love's absence than to describe its presence and meaning in our lives."

"Taught to believe that the mind, not the heart, is the seat of learning, many of us believe that to speak of love with any emotional intensity means we will be perceived as weak and irrational."

"We want to know what it means to love, what we can do in our everyday lives to love and be loved."

"And we spend a lifetime undoing the damage caused by cruelty, neglect, and all manner of lovelessness experienced in our families of origin and in relationships where we simply did not know what to do."

## chap1
-- on the importance of having a clear working definition

Quote from Diane Ackerman:
"Without a supple vocabulary, we can't even talk or think about it directly."

"Our confusion about what we mean when we use the word "love" is the source of our difficulty in loving.
If our society had a commonly held understanding of the meaning of love, the act of loving would not be so mystifying.
Dictionary definitions of love tend to emphasize romantic love [...]
However, deep affection does not really adequately describe love's meaning."
--vgl also bell hooks's text about the importance of theory for the praxis

".. all the more astute theorists of love acknowledge that we would all love better if we used it as a verb"

"Erich Fromm, he defines love as "the will to extend one's self for the purpose of nurturing one's own or another's spiritual growth."
Explaining further, he continues: "Love is as love does. Love is an act of will — namely, both an intention and an action.
Will also implies choice. We do not have to love. We choose to love.""
-- vgl also Amy March

DEF:
"Affection is only one ingredient of love.
To truly love we must learn to mix various ingredients — care, affection, recognition, respect, commitment, and trust, as well as honest and open commmunication.
Learning faulty definitions of love when we are quite young makes it difficult to be loving as we grow older."
-- vgl also the description of limerence ("being in love") and how contrasting its definition and actions seem to be from loving

or short version:
"genuine love ( a combination of care, commitment, trust, knowledge, responsibility, and respect)"

"When we understand love as the will to nurture our own and another's spiritual growth, it becomes clear that we cannot claim to love if we are hurtful and abusive.
Love and abuse cannot coexist.
Abuse and neglect are, by definition, the opposites of nurturance and care."

Am Rande, glaub, es tut nicht sehr viel zur Sache.
"An overwhelming majority of us come from dysfunctional families in which we were taught we were not okay, where we were shamed, verbally and/or physically abused, and emotionally neglected evenas were also taught to believe that we were loved.
For most folks it is just too threatening to embrace a definition of love that would no longer enable us to see love as present in our families."

"Most psychologically and/or physically abused children have been taught by parenting adults that love can coexist with abuse. [...]
So that just as we would cling to the notion that those who hurt us as children loved us, we try to rationalize being hurt by other adults by insisting that they love us."
"A lack of sustained love does not mean the absence of care, affection, or pleasure."

"One pattern that made the practice of love especially difficult was my constantly choosing to be with men who were emotionally wounded, who were not that interested in being loving even though they desired to be loved."
"I got what I was accustomed to getting — care and affection, usually mingled with a degree of unkindness, neglect, and, on some occasions, outright cruelty."

"many of us are more comfortable with the notion that love can mean anything to anybody precisely because when we define it with precision and clarity it brings us face to face with our lacks [..]
The truth is, far too many people in our culture do not know what love is."

"It is particularly distressing that so many recent books on love continue to insist that definitions of love are unnecessary and meaningless.
Or worse, the authors suggest love should mean something different to men than it does to women."
"This type of literature is popular because it does not demand a change in fixed ways of thinking about gender roles, culture, or love."

"To begin by always thinking of love as an action rather than a feeling is one way in which anyone using the word in this manner automatically assumes accountability and responsibility.
We are often taught we have no control over our "feelings".
Yet most of us accept that we choose our action, that intention and will inform what we do.
We also accept that our actions have consequences."


## chap3

"A commonly accepted assumption in a patriarchal culture is that love can be present in a situation where one group or individual dominates another."

"All visionary male thinkers challenging male domination insist that men can return to love only by repudiating the will to dominate."

Quoting Stoltenberg (whoever that is):
"Learning to live as a man of conscience means deciding that your loyalty to the people whom you loe is always more important than whatever lingering loyalty you may sometimes feel to other men's judgement on your manhood."

"Heterosexual women are often schooled by other women in the art of lying to men as a way to manipulate"
-- I guess this is one social repercussion of the understanding what love is on women

"We are encouraged to see hones people as naive, as potential losers."

"Lovelessness is a boon to consumerism."

"Creating a false self to mask fears and insecurities has become so common that many of us forget who we are and what we feel underneath the pretense."

"When we hear another person's thoughts, beliefs, and feelings, it is more difficult to project on to them our perception of who they are."
-- vgl limerence

## chap4

Quote M. Scott Peck
"Commitment is inherent in any genuinely loving relationship.
Anyone who is truly concerned for the spiritual growth of another knows, consciously or instinctively, that he or she can significantly foster that growth only through a relationship of constancy."

"Sexist socialization teaches females that self-assertiveness is a threat to femininity.
Accepting this faulty logic lays the groundwork for low self-esteem."

"Often, workers believe that if their home life is good, it does not matter if they feel dehumanized and exploited on the job."
-- you and me against the world baby -> uns die structurelle seelenlosigkeit in die schuhe schieben und wir müssen privat dafür aufkommen

"Many jobs undermine self-love because they require that workers constantly prove their worth.
Individuals who are dissatisfied and miserable on the job bring this negative energy home.
Clearly, much of the violence in domestic life, both physical and verbal abuse, is linked to job misery."


## chap 7

"Instead of looking for justice in the public world, individuals turned to their private lives, seeking a place of solace and escape.
Initially, lots of folks turned inward to family and relationships to find again a sense of connection and stability."
-- you and me against the world baby -> ist nur leider nicht nachhaltig, weil es die underlying politische probleme nicht löst

"Geniune love is rarely an emotional space where needs are instantly gratified.
To know genuine love we have to invest time and commitment.
As John Welwood reminds us in Journey of the Heart: The Path of Conscious Love, "dreamingthat love will save us, solve all our problems or provide a steady state of bliss or security only keeps us stuck in wishful fantasy, underminint hte real power of the love — which is to transform us."
Many people want love to funtion like a drug, giving them an immediate and sustained high.
They want to do nothing, just passively receive the good feeling.
In patriarchal culture men are especially inclined to see love as something they should receive without expending effort."

"When greedy consumption is the order of the day, dehumanization becomes acceptable.
Then, treating people like objects is not only acceptable but is required behavior."


## chap8

"Communities sustain life — not nuclear families, or the "couple", and certainly not the rugged individualist."

"Peck defines community as the coming together of a group of  individuals "who have learned how to communicate honestly with each other, whose relationships go deeper than their masks of composure, and who have developed some significant commintment to 'rejoice together, mourn together,' and to 'delight in each other, and make other's conditions our own.'"

"Replacing the family community with a more privatized small autocratic unit helped increase alienation and made abuses of power more possible."
"By encouraging the segregation of nuclear families from the extended family, women were forced to become more dependent on an individual man"
"[extended families].. are diverse and so are likely to include the presence of some individuals who are both sane and loving "


"Since we choose our friends, many of us, from childhood on into our adulthood, have looked to friends for the care, respect, knowledge and all-around nurturance of our growth that we did not find in the family."

"friendship is the place in which a great majority of us have our first glimpse of redemptive love and caring community"

"Often we take freindships for granted even when they are the interactions where we experience mutual pleasure.
We place them in a secondary position, especially in relation to romantic bonds.
This devaluation of our friendships creates an emptiness we may not see when we are devoting all our attention to finding someone to love romantically or giving all our attention to achosed loved one."

"I have felt especailly devastated when close friends who were signle fell in love and simultaneously fell away from our friendship."

"Trust is the hearbeat of genuine love."

"There is no special love exclusively reserved for romantic partners
Genuine love is the foundation of our engagement with ourselves, with family, with friends, with partners, with everyone we choose to love.
While we will necessarily behave differently depending on the nature of a relationship, or have varying degrees of commitment, the values that inform our behavior, when rooted in a love thic, are always the same for any interaction."

"I found myself accepting behavior (verbal and physical abuse) that I would not have tolerated in a friendship."
"I have been reaised conventionally to believe this relationship was "special" and should be revered above all.
Most women and men born in the fifties or earlier were socialized to believe that marriages and/or committed romantic bounds of any kind should take precendence over all other relationships.
Had I been evaluating my relationship from a standpoint that emphasized growth rather than duty and obligation, I would have understood that abuse irreparably undermines bonds. "

"In actuality, when we love rightly we know that the healthy, loving response to cruelty and abuse is putting ourselves out of harm's way."

"I would've been able to leave this relationship sooner or recover myself withn it had I brought to this bond the level of respect, care, knowledge , and responsibility I brought to friendships."

"Satisfying friendships in which we share mutual love provides a guide for behavior in other relationships, including romantic ones."

"Knowing how to be solitary is central to the art of loving.
When we can be alone, we can be with others without using them as a means of escape."


# chap9

"The widespread success of books like THe Rules: Time-tested Secrets for Capturing the Heart of Mr. RIght, which encourage women to deceive and manipulate to get a partner, express the cynicism of our times.
These books validate the old-fashioned sexist notions of sexual difference and encourage women to believe that no relationship between a man and a woman can be based on mutual respect, openness, and caring,
The message they give women is that relationships are always and only about power, manipulation, and coercion, about getting someone else to do what you want them to, even if it is against their will"
-- vlt kann man im Comic so was lesen und sich darüber lustig machen?

"In these books male inability and/or refusal to honestly express feelings is often talked about as a positive masculine virtue women should learn to accept rather than a leanred habit of behavior that creates emotional isolation and alienation."

"Self-help books that are anti-gender equality often present women's overinvestment in nurturance as a "natural", inherent quality rather than a learned approach to caregiving."

"More often than not females are taught in childhood, either by parental caregivers or the mass media, how to give the basic care that ir part of the practice of love.
We are shown how to be empathic, how to nurture, and, most important, how to listen."

"Choosing to be honest is the first step in the process of love."

"the first responsibility of love if to listen"

"Sometimes women hear repeatedly that their partners are "sick of listening to this shit.""
"Usually, partners who are unable to respond compassionately when hearing us speak our pain, whether they understand it or not, are unable to listen because that expressed hurt triggers their own feelings of powerlessness and helplessness."

"Discipline and devotion are necessary to the practice of love, all the more so when relationships are just beginning."
-- relationships are hard work
"Anyone who is truly concerned for the spiritual growth of another knows, consciously or instinctively, that he or she can significantly foster that growth only through a relationship of constancy."

"many people fear getting trapped in a bond that is not working, so they flee at the onset of conflict"

!!"Gettiing your emotional needs met helps create greater psychological well-being.
As a consequence, men are given an advantage that hneatly coincides with the patriarchal insistence that they are superior and therefore better suited to rule others.
Were women's emotional needs met, were mutuality the norm, male domination might lose its allure."

"put your partenr's interes on an equal footing with your own"


# chap 10

"to get the love we always wanted but never had, to have the love we want but are not prepared to give, we seek romantic relationships.
We believe these relationships, more than any other, will rescue and redeem us."

"So many seekers after love are taught in childhood to feel unworthy, that nobody could love them as they really are, and they construct a false self."
"At some point, glimpses of the real self emerge and disappointment comes."

"Few of us enter romantic relationships able to receive love.
We fall into romantic attachments doomed to replay familiar family dramas."

"We wanted the lover to appear but most of us were not really clear about what we wanted to do with them"

"In her first book, The Bluest Eye, novelist Toni Morrison identifies the idea of romantic love as one "of the most destructive ideas in the history of human thought."
Its destructiveness resides in the notion that we come to love with no will and no capacity to choose. "
-- according to Dorothy Tennov, limerence is kind of like that though

"when the click is there, it just happens — it overwhelms — it takes control.
This way of thinking about love seems to be especially useful for men who are socialized via patriarchal notions of masculinity to be out of touch with what they feel."

"In the essay "Love and Need", Thomas Merton contends:
"The expression to 'fall in love' reflects a peculiar attitude toward love and life itself — a mixture of fear, awe, fascination, and confusion.
It implies suspicion, doubt, hesitation in the presence of something unavoidable, yet not fully reliable."
If you do not know what you feel, the it is difficult to choose love; it is better to fall.
Then you do not have to be responsible for your actions."

"we continue to invest in the fantasy of efforless union.
We continue to believe we are swept away, caught up in the rapture, that we lack choice and will.
In THe Art of Loving, Fromm repeatedly talks about love as action, "essentially an act of will."
He writes:
"To love somebody is not just a strong feeling — it is a decision, it is a judgment, it is a promise.
If love were only a feeling, there would be no basis for the promise to love each other forever.
A feeling comes and it may go.""
-- that's exactly why Tennov contends that "love" (limerence) marriages tend to push divorce rates up. Limerence ends at some point and at this point it often fails to transform to the love bell hooks is looking for

"he describes love as the will to nurture one's own or another's spiritual growth, adding:
"The desire to love is not itself love.
Love is as love does.
Love is an act of will — namely, both an intention and action.
Will also implies choice.
We do not have to love. 
We choose to love.""

"most people want a partner "who is mature and intelligent, loyal and trustworthy, loving and attentive, sensitive and open, kind and nurturant, competent and responsible""

"To be capable of critically evaluating a partner we would need to be able to stand back and look critically at ourselves, at our needs, desires, longings.
It was difficult for me to really take out a piece of paper and evaluate myself to see if I was able to give the love I wanted to receive."

-- vgl "We accept the love we think we deserve"

"and then when I applied the list to men I had chosen as potential partners, it was painful to face the discrepancy between what I wanted and what I had chosen to accept.
We fear that evaluating our needs and then carefully choosing partners will reveal that there is no one for us to love.
Most of us prefer to have a partner who is lacking than no partner at all."

"approaching love with will and intentionality, I hear the fear expressed that this will bring an end to romance"
-- well it will, if like according to Tennov, romance = limerence. You can't approach limerence with will and intentionality. Or rather, you probably could, in its early stages in order to nip it.
Will and intentionality to be limerent may even trigger limerence.
But to act the whole time with will and intentionality just contradicts the definition of what limerence is.

"we often settle for lovelessness because we are attracted to other aspects of a partner's makeup.
Shared sexual passion can be a sustaining and binding force in a troubled relationship, but it is not the providing ground for love. "

"The intensity of sexual intimacy does not serve as a catalyst for respect, care, trust, understanding, and commitment."

"Our patterns around romantic love are unlikely to change if we do not change our language"

"Our culture may make much of love as compelling fantasy or myth, but it does not make much of the art of loving.
Our disappointment about love is directed at romantic love.
We fail at romantic love when we have not learned the art of loving."

"A perfect passion happens when we meet someone who appears to have everything we have wanted to find iun a partner.
I say "appears" because the intensity of our connection usually blinds us.
We see what we want to see. 
-- that's a reasobable description of limerence

"We can only move from perfect passion to perfect love when the illusions pass and we are able to use the energy and intensity generated by intense, overwhelming, erotic bonding to heighten self-discovery."
-- in other words limerence could give way to love (in bell hooks's sense) or affectionate bonding

"The few who still believe in true love offered their deep conviction that "you can't look for it,"
that if it's meant for you "it will just happen.""
-- vgl Amy March

"True love does not always lead to happily ever after, and even when it does, sustaining love still takes work."
"All relatioships have ups and downs.
Romantic fantasy often nurtures the belief that difficulties and down times are an indication of a lack of love rather than part of the process."

"Usually we imagine that true love will be intensely pleasurable and romantic, full of love and light.
In truth, true love is all about work."

"Who among us has not learned the hard way that we cannot change someone, mold them and make them into the ideal beloved we might want them to be.
Yet when we commit to true love, we are committed to being changed[...]
This commitment to change is chosen."

"The hearbeat of true love is the willingness to reflect on one's actins, and to process and communicate this reflection with the loved one."

"Honesty and openness is always the foundation[...]
Most of us have not been raised in homes where we have seen two deeply loving grown folks talking together.
We do not see this on television or at the movies."
--Referenzstories fehlen

#chap 13

"As long as we feel shame, we can never believe ourselves worthy of love."
--vgl beauty standards











------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


# Laurie Penny - Chapter Love and Lies

"And yet somehow, so little has changed.
Because despite their money, their privilege, their friendships, the great sex they seemed to be having, the jobs they apparently had, although they rarely seemed to actually do them, the weird spoilt child-women of Sex and the City were still miserable, still looking for something — if they hadn't been, there would have been no story.
What they were looking for was what every woman and girl is still, always, supposed to be looking for: love.
For monogamous, marriage-minded romantic partnership with the man of their dreams.
Every girl's story was a love story."
(-vgl Little Women: "And if the main character is a girl, make sure she is married by the end")

"It demonstrated that even the most powerful, liberated women the world had ever known could still bebrought low by love, could still be ruined by disappointment in the quest for love."

"The colonisation of love by capitalist patriarchy is a deeply painful thing.
It means that structural sexism and cultural violence are played out on small, private stages, which is what makes them so very hard to recognise and resist.
    Human love is radical, and it is devastating.
And human love has been thoroughly captured by neoliberalism, by the mindset and mechanisms of profit."

"Love is a gendered thing.
It also makes life worth living and politics worth doing.
Everyone seems to agree that love is important — but what sort of love?"
"Part of the problem is our lack of language to describe love, and that problem is political.
Semantic context collapse means that we only have one word, 'love', for the vast spectrum of passion and compassion, compresion and care that make our species worth saving.
The English language has hundreds of thousands of words,[..], but only one to describe the very thing we're told is most important."
-> Idea: Struggling with this; Spoken-word performance of bell hooks (and her definition of love)


"And of every possible definition of love, it is romantic love between couples, monogamous sexual and social commitment between two people that is considered the most important."
-> Vgl Outlander: Claire gets back in time to be with Jamie
(and at some point has a melt-down realising that she left her whole life, friends and work she loves behind. Which then miraculously disappears, never to be questioned again.)
"This is no accident.
    Love and fucking are the field on which gender gets personal.
Where stereotypes are cast in craving and formed in bitterness on every side."

"The more I talk to people about love and work and gender and sex and power, the more it comes down to[..] the stories we tell ourselves and how they map on to our experience of real human beings trying to fit our messy, meaty hearts into the anatomically inaccurate totem of romance."
-> Vgl: Stories spoilt me for romantic love (and also for any love bc I am aspiring to the unreachable ideal of the romantic love) because they created unrealistic expectations of it is supposed to look like.
And the thing about stories is, they are not real.
"the thing about stories is that somebody made them up"

-> Also, I don't have time for a relationship
"I was no longer That Girl.
I didn't have time to save boys any more.
I had other priorites, and those priorities included writing.
You cannot be a writer and have writing be anything other than the central romance of your life"

"And yet love, romantic love, is the one thing we're not supposed to queston.
Why not?"

"When we talk about love conquering all, when we speak, in that glazed, cultish way, of love's healing power.. we are not talking about love in its broadest sense.
We are not referring to the actual practice of caring for a person and being cherished in return, or of giving of oneself for another, whether that be a friend, a family member, a lover or a stranger."
"The notion of romance that we are all encouraged to go searching for is something different.
It is something smaller and more specific.
It is love as ritual and as product, [..] love whose highest ideal is still hererosexual, monogamous romance leading eventually to lasting marriage."
-> "as ritual": vgl Teenies/Pretenies and Crushes: it is a ritual; something to participate in ("ich hab fast das gefühl, ein teil davon war, nur um da mitzumachen und sich mit iwas zu beschäftigen")
This sort of love is valued above every other, even though it is now a minority practice, and even though the many millions who are living happily in such partnerships find the reality far more complex than is considered proper to discuss."
-> no one acknowledges it is actually hard work to maintain a working relationship; a lot of communication, time, energy;

"Both stories, LoveTM and SexTm, hold us up to impossible standards.
Both demand that we see another person as less than human, merely a body filling a prewritten role in our script or romantic or erotic extasy.
Both are wildly unrealistic, and both set us up to fail."
-> Beweis for love is work; for stories spoilt me for relationships; also vgl limerence

"Back in the real world, most people's lives exist on a spectrum somewhere between One True Love and meaningless rutting.
Even those of us taken in by the fantasy know this to be the case, and yet it's frowned upon to speak of that spectrum in positive terms.
We are required instead to acknowledge that any person or pair of persons failing to achieve LoveTM or SexTm are doomed to live terribly sad lives"

"LoveTM has become devotional, especially for women.
We search for it, profess belief in it, make sacrifices for it."

"The quest for Great Love is the ultimate devotion, the ultimate sign of being a good woman who can command the interest of men."
"LoveTM demands demonstrations of faith in the face of logic.
'The perfect person is out there,' we say to our friends who are single and sad, as if merely repeating the mantra might make it so."

"Religion, like opium, was a refuge from the anxieties of the age, replacing personal, individual dispair with a whole new set of problems.
Right now, romantic love as we know it functions in much the same way."
"We don't just fall for all of this romantic faff because we're stupid, or guillable, or weak.
We fall because we want to, because we need to believe that something will make the rest of our lives safe and meaningful.
The postures of romance, particularly straight, married romance, allow us to reject the grim meat-hook reality of work and death even as they fashion us for it, pairing us off into little pockets of pain and passion: you and me against the world, baby."
->vlt include cupcake poem??
"To Laurie Penny
Romantic love, we're told, is something rare and precious,
shared love is like the sweet sweet icing of a double-chocolate cupcake:
two hearts and two souls melt into one sticky sugary substance in a paper muffin form.
Each one in its own separate private nest on the muffin pan conform
with what they told us love was like: "The two of us against the world",
                                                and if by some mistake
the dough spills over and more cupcakes on the pan connect
the baker throws them in the trash without a second thought or due respect."

"You can use it [human passion] to isolate people in antagonistic pairs and let them blame each other for the structural lack of sweetness in the world."

"Women across the classes are taught to seek the love of men first, to assess our worth on the basis of how good we are at keeping and holding male attention.
And across the classes, romantic humiliation can be used to bring women low."
(vgl vlt Ch's "Früher dacht ich, es wäre ein Kompliment, wenn mir jemand nen Klaps auf den Hintern verpasst.")

"But men, too, have equal power of refusal in relationships.
They can refuse to give of themselves in a way that is equally humiliating to women who have grown up learning that they were failing on a basic level if they could not command the love and commitment of men.
And that's it. That's how heterosexuality makes us all miserable."

The story about "but I only kiss very beautiful girls"
"He's drunk. He doesn't mean to be that much of a prick.
But we both know what he means, and it hurts because he's right: I'm not the sort of girl who gets kissed by boys like that.
I'm not a sexy little package. I'm scrappy and opinionated....."
"And for a moment that sins out reeling in the hurt, private parts of the heart, I wish I was a different kind of girl.
A girl like the girl I see the same boy rolling under a blanket with in the communal bedding area two hours later, soft-spoken with long, pretty hair.
I am eaten up by jealousy, and that's how they get you.
It's the night before a big march, but I abandon sleep.
Instead, I get the laptop out and take it to a place where people are too stoned and sleepy to take notice of my pathetic little tears.
This is stupid. There's work to be done.
Tomorrow tens of thousands of us are going to take to the streets to demand fair access to education, and my smashed little heart shouldn't matter. But it odes.
The whole world is changing, and I just want to be the kind of girl who gets taken in somebody's arms.
[...]
I think about maybe growing my hair out and wearing more skirts.
And that's how they get you.
That's how they keep you in line."

"But deep down, I know if I choose not to play the good girl game, I might not get as many kisses as I want.
And that's so much more terrifying."
"This, then, is how women are kept in line.
The threat of violence is a fearful thing, but its injustice is clear, and there is always the risk of rebellion. [..]
To tell a person that if they don't do what they're told they will never be loved is an existential threat akin to soul murder.
'If you do not do this, you will be beaten' is ultimately far less effective than 'if you do not do this, nobody will love you.'
It is that fear that keeps us cowed and conformist."
"We don't pare ourselves down and tart ourselves up and process our personality into the mould deemed most pleasing by mainstream culture because we're stupid, or cowardly.
We do it because we fear loss of love.
We do it because we grew up learning, unless our parents were particularly enlightened, that we were unworthy of love unless we conformed to a certain set of rules about how to look, dress and behave."
"If you do follow all the rules, if you ever get it perfectly right, then, of course, you're a dull bimbo, a brainless fembot, just as unworthy of male respect as the ones who didn't."

(comment on Kate Middleton cult)
"As social mobility collapes, princess propaganda is enjoying a shocking pink renaissance, hooking grown women who should know better into the hoary old narrative of One True Love leading inexorably to titular rights to the Duchy of Lancaster.
When we grow up, the princess becomes the shining girl, the good girlfriend.
It may look less likely we'll inherit Cornwall, but we can still be somebody else's beautiful sidekick, which is the best thing a girl can be.
We talk a lot about women as sex objects, but the reduction of women to love objects does just as much damage;[..]
The love object is a thing to be desired and pitied all at once.
She is the helpmeet, the saint, the fantasy.
She is never a complete person.
Whatever attributes make her interesting — maybe she can cook, or sew, or shoot a gun, or solve a crime — she exists ultimately for the hero's edification.
She is nothing without him."
-> Vgl Jo March "I'm sick of .. love is the only thing a woman is fit for."; and manic pixie dream girl; limerence

"Just as many of us, however, spend our lives trying to mould ourselves into love objects.
Almost every female protagonist, in every story written or designed by men, is a love object: a creature fabricated to fulfil a role in somebody else's grand narrative."
-> Vgl Daisy Jones: "I'm not a muse. I'm somebody. End of the fucking story."
"The love object is always a supporting character[...]
She delights, she entices, she is slender and beautiful and whimsical and invariably poorly written, and so many of us spend a great deal of time trying to be her.
Stories shape us, even the shit ones.
Even the ones that are simplistic and obviate a great deal of real-life experience by design.
Stories are how we organise our lives, how we streamline our desires, and sometimes they fall short, and sometimes they disappoint us, and they always matter.
For women, love stories are the stories we are allowed to cast ourselves in, and those are the stories that shape our cravings and identities."
-> They get me every fucking time (except the ones that are really really poorly written. Maybe I should move to Inverness as well^^)

"LoveTM is meant to be the overwhelming object of a woman's early life; her story ends when she finds it, or fails to find it.
The most important thing is that her story ends."
"young men [...] have so many other stories to work with"
"Little girls, though, only ever get two choices: we can be the princess, or we can be the witch." //Actually, I think we could also be the fairy godmother (which is probably also the only positive narrative for an elderly woman who is not married)

"This is why female artists and women writers remain figures of suspicion.
Men are allowed to make their work, their practice, the central romance of their lives.
Men are allowed to love their art, their writing, their passion, a little bit more than anything else.
Women are not, and if we choose to do so anyway, we will always be seen as lacking something, or taking on a man's role, or both.
Whatever else we do with our lives, we must carve out part of our hearts in the service of others, or we are not really women.
We are permitted to be the wives and lovers of great men, but if we try to become great ourselves [..] there must be something wrong with us."

"I was a manic pixie dream girl"
-> yeah, me too

"Women behave in was that they find sanctioned in stories written by men who know better, and men and women seek out friends and partners who remind them of a girl they met in a book one day when they were young and longing."
"For me, Manic Pixie Dream Gril was the story that fit."
Following description on why -> adapt this
"I had the raw materials: I'm five feet nothing, petite and small-featured with skin the colour of something left on the bottom of a pond for too long and messy hair that's sometimes dyed a shocking shade of red or pink.
At least, it was before I washed all the dye out last year, partly to stop soulful Zach-Braff-a-likes following me to the shops.
And, yes, I'm a bit strange and sensitive and daydreamy, and, yes, I retain a somwhat embarassing belief in the ultimate decency of humanity and the transformative brilliance of music, lathough I'm ambivalent on the Shins.
I love to dance, I play the guitar badly, and I also — since we are in confession mode, dear reader, hear and forgive — I also play the fucking ukulele. Truly."
-> For the adaptation: I also have messy hair, which I hated when growing up bc it essentially allowed one hairstyle: this what my mother called " an unraveled basket" or "kicked around cabbage"; and in which at some point I started to take some weird pride, bc it was easier that way since it required zero action and it was something people seemed to like (which I was always kind of suspicious towards);
tried dying my hair pink, but never went the whole way of actually bleaching it first, partially out of fear that it'll fall out and partially out of plain old lazyness.
I did cut half of it once, due do a drunken bet though.
I play the guitar, or rather, used to, initially forced into it by my parents since "we have no space to put in a piano, but here's you father's old guitar" and rather lacklusterly; (which may have partially been due to the teachers who came from classical music and never seemed to have anything interesting to play) later; I took a liking to it, partially bc it seemed cool and you know "this is what girls fall for" (or maybe the boys?)
I walked around in middle school, the time when girls fought wars over Britney Spears vs Christina Agilera and Spice Girls vs Backstreet Boys, telling everyone that my favourite band was Queen, of which I've heard a grand total of 2 albums (or 3?), one of which was "Greatest Hits" (to be fair, I rather liked Queen and still do, so it was not a pose per se.)
I like to dance and sing, which I both do in a reasonably mediocre fashion, but it's fun.
In highschool, I went throught the obligatory phase of picking up street signs and cones and other random stuff of the streets and giving people cobble stones for their birthdays.
And of course, through the phase of doodling on your sneakers and drawing stuff on your own shirts (I even painted my prom dress).
And I also, "doubtless honed by that learned girlish desire to please", have always gone out of my way to include new people in groups.

"But the Manic Pixie is never a point-of-view character, and she isn't understood from the inside.
She's one of those female tropes who is permitted precisely no interiority.
Instead of a personality, she has eccentricities, a vaguely offbeat favourite band, a funky fringe."
"Most of the classic Manic Pixie Dream Girls claim to be ironic re-imaginings of a character trope that they fail to actually interrogate in any way.
Irony is, of course, the last vestige of modern crypto-misogyny: all those lazy stereotypes and hurtful put-downs are definitely a joke, right up until they aren't, and clearly youneed a man to tell you when and if you're supposed to take sexism seriously."
"Men write women, and they rewrite us, for revenge.
It's about obsession, and control."
"[...] Kazan told the Huffington Post.
'Everybody is setting out to write a full character.
It's just that some people are limited in their imagination of a girl. '


"She doesn't get a story. She is part of a story that happens to other people."
"Men grow up expecting to be the hero of their own story.
Women grow up expecting to be the supporting actress in somebody else's."
-> Vgl Daisy Jones. (Und Margarete Stokowski)

"If we want anything interesting at all to happen to us we have to be a story that happens to somebody else"

"Lady hobbits didn't bring the ring to Mordor. They stayed at home in the Shire."
-> Vlt kann man iwie die 20sec Zusammenschnitt of 2 women interacting in the whole LOTR trilogy einbauen.

"I was prepared for the personal to be political.
What I didn't understand until quite recently was that the political can be so, so personal."

"a choice to stop being That Girl and start becoming a grown woman, which is the worst possible thing a girl can do, which is why so many of those Manic Pixie Dream Girl characters, as written by male geeks and scriptwriters, either die tragically young or are somehow immortally fixed at the physical and mental age of nineteen and a half.
Meanwhile, in th real world, the very worst thing about being a real-life MPDG is the look of disappointment on the face of someone you really care about when they find out you're not their fantasy at all — you're a real human who breaks wind and has a job."

"And it's a struggle.
Because I reamin a small, friendly, excitable person who wears withy colours and has a tendency towards the twee."

"So, here's what I've learned, in twenty-seven years of reading books and kissing boys.
Firstly, avaregely pretty white women in their late teens and twenties are not the biggest, most profoundly unsolvable mystery in the universe. [...]
Those of us with an ounce of lust for life are almost universally less interesting than we will be in our thirties and forties."
"The one abiding secret about us is that we're not fantasies, and we weren't made to save you: we are real people, with flaws and cracked personalities and big dreams and digetive tracts."

"Because it turns out that LoveTM is also the theoretical basis for most of the work done for free, largely by women, so that the mechanisms of profit and production can be maintained.
Most of the work of childcare, cooking, cleaning, personal care, helpmeeting and mopping up your husband's ego after a hard day's wage labour is not recognised as 'real work' because it is done out of 'love'"
"a lot of work that women do remains unpaid or underpaid because we think of it as 'love', as a moral expression of feelng rather than a practical task of immense and tangible value"

"For men, LoveTm is more likely to mean continuing in one's occupation of choice with the support of a partner who cherishes and believes in you, will take care of you when work exhausts you, will handle all the arrangements for the care and upbringing of your children so you don't have to hink about it, and will provide you with your preferredform of sexual release at the end of the working day."

".. and even a minority who work as primary carers for children, but that minority is still small — and enormously culturally underrepresented to the extent that such arrangements still fail to register in the life plans of most young men."
-- die dann auch krass gefeiert werden, dass sie ein bisschen Zeit mit ihren Kindern verbracht haben

"For men, love is supposed to be the reward you get in return for work; for women, love is work in itself."

"Marriage used to be understood as an essentially economic arrangement."-> vgl Amy March

On marriage:
"'the net effect of the neoliberal economic policies imposed in recent decades has been to push economic and social responsibility away from eployers and government and onto private households.[...] In more and more cases, the sole remaining resoure is the cooperative, mutually supporting household or kinship netowrk. 
But if marriage is the symbolic and legal anchor or households and kinship networks, and marriage is increasingly unstable, how relable will that source of support be?'" (quoting Richard Kim and Lisa Duggan from "Beyound Gay Marriage")

"Women learn to fear being 'left on the shelf', to associate it with poverty and isolation."

"We are all encouraged to feel sorry for ourselves if we are single, to consider ourselves incomplete, but women in particular are urged to consider themselves inferior if their time in not spent comforting and cosseting a man, and ideally, children too."
-- the two halves of an orange

"Your job is now your boyfriend: neither of them can be trusted to stick around, so you'd better make sure they know how much you love them."

"It's not that I don't believe in romantic love, in LoveTM.
It patently exists. People shape their lives to stories, and sometimes it works." 
-- and sometimes it doesn't^^, leaving you feeling inferior
"LoveTM is not true love, in the sense that many other kinds of love are also true."

"But the relatively recent cultural narrative of The One — the idea that everyone has a soulamte whom they are destined to love for ever, and that your life will always be incomplete if you fail to meet, mate and move in with that person — that's not just implausible, it's cruel."
-- vgl "If there's only one person for you in the whole world and you lose them, does that mean that you have to live the rest of your life without anyone else? I think you, we, anyone, has to be open to possibilities"

"The people for whom LoveTm works [...] are in the minority.
Now that we are not obliged to choose between celibate loneliness and yoking ourselves for ever to a person we may grow to despise, most people's lives contain many important relationships, and sometimes those relationships fade or fizzle out.
That may not fit in with the dominant ideology — that monogamous marriage is the only possible healthy way to live,love and distribute welfare benefits — but it's a more accurate map of the human heart"

"No wonder increasing numbers of young people are exploring options — polyamory, open relationships, extended circles of chosen family and fuckbuddies"

"Fre love is love that is not co-opted or coerced, lovethat is not mutually oppressive, love that is not another word for work, duty and conformity."

"The idea that we have no control over who we love and what we do about it is one of the most disempowering things girls are ever told.
Loneliness is a fearful thing.
But a life lived grasping for another person to make you whole is just as fearful.
If you see yourself as incomplete without a partner to be your 'other half', you will always be lonely, even in a partnership."
//vgl Amy March; vgl two halves of an orange;


# Fazit

"If we want to escape the straitjacket of gender under neoliberalism, we must stop trying so hard to hold ourselves and others up to impossible standards, standards we didn't set ourselves.
We have to resist the schooled inner voice teling us to be good girls, tough boys, perfect women, strong men.
If we are to realise a greater collective humanity, we must learn to see one another as human beings first."

"We must refuse to judge others by any standard other than that of kindness and decency.
We must not start out by apologising for all that we are.
It's about saying no and expecting that no to be respected."

"Because when we are done hating oursleves and hurting each other, wecanget on with asking for what should be ours by right."
"Neoliberal patriarchy gives us choice, but not freedom."
"Feminism and radical politics are about demanding more than a choice between one type of servitude and another."
